Idaho, session 2026, H0968.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE TRANSFER REDUCED 4% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026. There
is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer
$5,803,500 from the Permanent Building Fund that is obligated for remodeling
legislative space to the Legislative Account as soon as practicable. Upon
passage and approval of this act, and after the cash transfer in this sec-
tion has occurred, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of
the House of Representatives shall direct the Office of the State Controller
to limit the amount transferred from the General Fund to the Legislative Ac-


count pursuant to Section 67-451(2), Idaho Code, to $8,170,600 for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. IDAHO BROADBAND FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026.
There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller shall
transfer $13,000,000 from the Idaho Broadband Fund to the General Fund as
soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. SCHOOL DISTRICT BUILDING ACCOUNT CASH TRANSFER FOR FIS-
CAL YEAR 2026. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer the remaining balances from the School District
Building Account, with the exception of the Public Schools Facilities Coop-
erative Fund subaccount, to the General Fund as soon as practicable for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. TWENTY-SEVENTH PAYROLL FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR FISCAL YEAR
2026. It is the intent of the Legislature that if General Fund revenues for
fiscal year 2026 do not meet the legislative target of $5,510,100,000 and the
remaining cash balance in the General Fund is insufficient to cover revenue
shortfalls for the remainder of fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding the provi-
sions of Section 57-826, Idaho Code, the State Board of Examiners is autho-
rized to direct the Office of the State Controller, between May 1, 2026, and
June 30, 2026, to transfer sufficient funds from the Twenty-seventh Payroll
Fund to the General Fund for the purpose of balancing the state budget. Such
transfer is considered an appropriation of moneys.
SECTION 5. CASH TRANSFER TO THE STRATEGIC INITIATIVES FUND FOR FISCAL
YEAR 2026. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer 50% of the interest earnings generated in fiscal
years 2024, 2025, and 2026 to the American Rescue Plan Act State and Local
Fiscal Recovery Fund or $32,877,300, whichever is greater, to the Strategic
Initiatives Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026. The amount shall be confirmed with the Legislative Services
Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division.
SECTION 6. CASH TRANSFER TO THE FIRE SUPPRESSION DEFICIENCY WARRANT
FUND FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer 50% of the interest earnings generated in
fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026 to the American Rescue Plan Act State and
Local Fiscal Recovery Fund or $32,877,200, whichever is greater, to the Fire
Suppression Deficiency Warrant Fund as soon as practicable for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The amount shall be confirmed with the
Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division.
SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE TRANSFER REDUCED 5% FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027. On
July 1, 2026, and after the cash transfer in Section 1 of this act has oc-
curred, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House
of Representatives shall direct the Office of the State Controller to limit
the amount transferred from the General Fund to the Legislative Account pur-


suant to Section 67-451(2), Idaho Code, to $8,085,500 for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 8. BUDGET STABILIZATION FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR FISCAL YEAR
2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 57-814, Idaho Code, and any
other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer interest earnings generated from the fund balance in the Bud-
get Stabilization Fund during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027,
to the General Fund on June 30, 2027, or as soon thereafter as practicable.
Such amount shall be confirmed with the Legislative Services Office Budget
and Policy Analysis Division and only be used to ensure a minimum General
Fund ending cash balance of $150,000,000 as determined by the legislative
record.
SECTION 9. PUBLIC EDUCATION STABILIZATION FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR FIS-
CAL YEAR 2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 33-907, Idaho
Code, and any other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer interest earnings generated from the fund
balance in the Public Education Stabilization Fund during the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to the General Fund on June 30, 2027, or as
soon thereafter as practicable. Such amount shall be confirmed with the
Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division and only be
used to ensure a minimum General Fund ending cash balance of $150,000,000 as
determined by the legislative record.
SECTION 10. WATER POLLUTION CONTROL FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR FISCAL YEAR
2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 39-3630, Idaho Code, and
any other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer interest earnings generated from the fund balance
in the Water Pollution Control Fund during the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027, to the General Fund on June 30, 2027, or as soon thereafter as
practicable. Such amount shall be confirmed with the Legislative Services
Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division and only be used to ensure a min-
imum General Fund ending cash balance of $150,000,000 as determined by the
legislative record.
SECTION 11. PERMANENT BUILDING FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 57-1108, Idaho Code, and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the State Controller shall
transfer interest earnings generated from the fund balance in the Permanent
Building Fund during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to the
General Fund on June 30, 2027, or as soon thereafter as practicable. Such
amount shall be confirmed with the Legislative Services Office Budget and
Policy Analysis Division and only be used to ensure a minimum General Fund
ending cash balance of $150,000,000 as determined by the legislative record.
SECTION 12. STRATEGIC INITIATIVES PROGRAM (DEDICATED) FUND CASH TRANS-
FER FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 40-719,
Idaho Code, and any other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer interest earnings generated from the fund


balance in the Strategic Initiatives Program (Dedicated) Fund during the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to the General Fund on June 30,
2027, or as soon thereafter as practicable. Such amount shall be confirmed
with the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division
and only be used to ensure a minimum General Fund ending cash balance of
$150,000,000 as determined by the legislative record.
SECTION 13. STRATEGIC INITIATIVES PROGRAM (LOCAL) FUND CASH TRANSFER
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 40-719,
Idaho Code, and any other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer interest earnings generated from the fund
balance in the Strategic Initiatives Program (Local) Fund during the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to the General Fund on June 30, 2027, or
as soon thereafter as practicable. Such amount shall be confirmed with the
Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division and only be
used to ensure a minimum General Fund ending cash balance of $150,000,000 as
determined by the legislative record.
SECTION 14. STRATEGIC INITIATIVES GRANT PROGRAM FUND CASH TRANSFER FOR
FISCAL YEAR 2027. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer the remaining balance in the Strategic Initia-
tives Grant Program Fund to the General Fund for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027. Such amount shall not be less than $4,150,200 and
shall be confirmed with the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy
Analysis Division and only be used to ensure a minimum General Fund ending
cash balance of $150,000,000 as determined by the legislative record.
SECTION 15. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 7 through 14 of this
act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.